Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.215

Overlapping service areas—Regional planning agreements.

The colleges in each overlapping service area shall jointly submit for approval to the state board for community and technical colleges a regional planning agreement. The agreement shall provide for the ongoing interinstitutional coordination of community and technical college programs and services operated in the overlapping service area. The agreement shall include the means for the adjudication of issues arising from overlapping service areas. The agreement shall include a definitive statement of mission, scope, and purpose for each college including the nature of courses, programs, and services to be offered by each college.

Technical colleges may, under the rules of the state board for community and technical colleges, offer all specific academic support courses that may be at a transfer level that are required of all students to earn a particular certificate or degree. This shall not be interpreted to mean that their mission may be expanded to include transfer preparation, nor does it preclude technical colleges from voluntarily and cooperatively using available community college courses as components of technical college programs.

Any part of the agreement that is not approved by all the colleges in the service area, shall be determined by the state board for community and technical colleges. Approved regional planning agreements shall be enforced by the full authority of the state board for community and technical colleges. Changes to the agreement are subject to state board approval.

For the purpose of creating and adopting a regional planning agreement, the trustees of the colleges in Pierce county shall form a county coordinating committee. The county coordinating committee shall consist of eight members. Each college board of trustees in Pierce county shall select two of its members to serve on the county coordinating committee. The county coordinating committee shall not employ its own staff, but shall instead utilize staff of the colleges in the county. The regional planning agreement adopted by the county coordinating committee shall include, but shall not be limited to: The items listed in this section, the transfer of credits between technical and community colleges, program articulation, and the avoidance of unnecessary duplication in programs, activities, and services.

[ 1997 c 281 s 2; 1991 c 238 s 144.]